Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-224 Execution of policies.
(a) Every insurance contract shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of
the insurer by its officer, employee or authorized representative.

(b) A facsimile signature of any executing
officer, employee or representative may be used in lieu of an original
signature.

(c) The facsimile signature of any person not
authorized to execute contracts as of the date of the policy will not
invalidate an otherwise valid insurance contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next